Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Finance

48-249-301. Contribution and acceptance.

Permissible forms. A contribution to an LLC may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the LLC, including money, a promissory note, services performed, or an obligation or agreement to contribute money or property, or to perform services.

Signed writing required. A contribution agreement, whether made before or after the formation of the LLC, is not enforceable against the prospective contributor, unless it is in writing and signed by the prospective contributor.

Acceptance required. Neither a purported contribution nor an offer of consideration to make a contribution shall be treated as a contribution to an LLC until:

The contribution is accepted by the members, in the case of a member-managed LLC, by both the members and the managers, in the case of a manager-managed LLC, or by both the members and the directors, in the case of a director-managed LLC; and

The amount and value of the contribution are recorded in the LLC documents or the records of the LLC.

Required determinations. The amount, the terms and conditions of payment or performance, and the value and adequacy of the consideration to an LLC for each contribution, shall be determined by the members, in the case of a member-managed LLC, by both the members and the managers, in the case of a manager-managed LLC, or by both the members and the directors, in the case of a director-managed LLC. The determination of the amount, value and adequacy of the consideration to an LLC for a contribution is valid and binding, if made in good faith and on the basis of accounting methods or a fair valuation or other method, including agreement as to value by the contributor and the LLC, as provided in this section, reasonable in the circumstances. Inclusion of the amount of a contribution and the value of the consideration for a contribution in the LLC documents or the records of the LLC is evidence of the acceptance of the amount and the value of a contribution.

Required approval. The vote or consent of the members required to accept a contribution shall be the same as the vote or consent required to admit a member under § 48-249-501.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-302. Liability for contributions.

Obligation to perform. A member or other person who has agreed in writing to make a contribution of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to, or to perform services for, an LLC is obligated to make that contribution, even if the member or other person is unable to perform personally because of death, disability or any other reason.

Option to require cash. If a member or other person does not make a required contribution of property or services, then, at the option of the LLC to which the member or other person is obligated, the member or the other person shall be obligated to contribute money equal to the value, as stated in the LLC documents or the records of the LLC, of the portion of the required contribution that has not been made. This option of the LLC is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other rights and remedies, including the right to specific performance, that the LLC or its members may have against such member or other person, whether under this chapter, under the LLC documents, or otherwise.

Enforcement by creditor. A creditor of an LLC that extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection (a), and without notice of any compromise under § 48-249-401(f)(3), may enforce the original obligation.

Remedies on default. The LLC documents may provide that the interest of any member or other person who fails to make any contribution that the member or other person is obligated to make to an LLC shall be subject to specified penalties for, or specified consequences of, such failure. Such a penalty or consequence may take the form of:

Reducing or eliminating the defaulting member's or person's proportional interest in the LLC;

Subordinating the interest of the defaulting member or other person to that of nondefaulting members or other persons;

Forcing a sale of the interest of the defaulting member or other person;

Causing forfeiture of the interest of the defaulting member or other person;

Permitting other members or persons to lend to the LLC the amount necessary to satisfy the obligation of the defaulting member or other person, and charging interest on the borrowed amount, at a rate up to the highest rate allowed by law, with repayments of the loans being made from the distributions allocable to the interest of the defaulting member or other person;

Fixing the value of the interest of the defaulting member or other person by appraisal or by formula and redemption, or selling the interest of the defaulting member or other person at that fixed value; or

Any other penalty or consequence.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-303. Interests in LLC.

Classification of interests. The LLC documents may provide for classes or groups of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights, having the relative rights, preferences, limitations, powers and duties provided in the LLC documents, and may make provision for the future creation, in the manner provided in the LLC documents, of additional classes or groups of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights having the relative rights, powers and duties from time to time established, including financial rights, preferences, limitations, powers and duties that are senior or subordinate to existing classes and groups of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights. The LLC documents may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the LLC documents, without the vote or approval of any director, manager, member or holder of financial rights or of any class or group of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights, including an action to create a class or group of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights under the LLC documents. The LLC documents may denominate membership interests or financial rights as units, shares, percentages, participations, distribution interests, ownership or economic interests, with or without voting rights, and with or without fixed or variable rights to participate in distributions, assets and properties, allocations of profits and losses and fixed or variable obligations to the LLC or any combination of these things.

Voting rights. The LLC documents may grant to all or certain identified directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights, or to one (1) or more specified classes or groups of the directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights, the right to vote separately or to vote with all or any other classes or groups of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights, on any matter. The voting rights of directors, managers, members and holders of financial rights may be per capita, or by number, unit, share, percentage, participation, economic interest or financial rights, or by one (1) or more classes or groups, or on any other basis. The LLC documents may provide that any director, manager, member or holder of financial rights, or any class or group of directors, managers, members or holders of financial rights, shall have full, partial, limited or no voting rights with respect to any or all matters.

Financial rights nonvoting. Except as otherwise provided in the LLC documents, a holder of financial rights that is not also a member does not have a right to vote by reason of, or with respect to, such financial rights.

Parity of interests. Except as otherwise provided in the LLC documents, all membership interests and financial rights shall be of the same class and group, with the same relative rights, powers and duties, and without preferences, subordinations or limitations.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-304. Sharing of and rights to profits and losses.

LLC documents control. Any profits and losses of an LLC shall be allocated among the members and holders of financial rights in the manner provided in the LLC documents.

LLC documents silent. If the LLC documents do not provide for allocations of profits and losses, profits and losses shall be allocated among the members and holders of financial rights in equal shares.

Record date. The LLC documents may provide for a record date with respect to allocations of profits and losses.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, § 23.

48-249-305. Sharing of and rights to distributions.

LLC documents control. Any distributions by an LLC shall be allocated and distributed among the members and holders of financial rights in the manner provided in the LLC documents.

LLC documents silent. If the LLC documents do not provide for the allocations of distributions, then distributions, including distributions on termination of the LLC, except as provided in § 48-249-620, shall be allocated among the members and holders of financial rights in equal shares.

Record date. The LLC documents may provide for a record date with respect to distributions.

In kind distributions. Neither a member nor a holder has a right to demand or receive a distribution in kind, regardless of the contribution of the member or holder. Neither a member nor a holder may be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from an LLC, to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the member or holder exceeds a percentage of that asset that is equal to the percentage in which the member or holder shares in distributions from the LLC.

Status of recipient. If a member or holder of financial rights becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member or holder of financial rights has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a general, unsecured creditor of the LLC with respect to the distribution.

Entitlement to receive distributions. A member or holder of financial rights is entitled to receive distributions before dissolution, only as provided by the LLC documents or by a majority vote of the members of a member-managed LLC, the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or the directors of a director-managed LLC, as applicable.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, § 24.

48-249-306. Limitations on distributions.

Restriction on distributions. No distribution may be made by an LLC, if, after giving effect to the distribution:

The LLC would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of business; or

The LLC's total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities, other than liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property, plus the amount that would be needed, if the LLC were to be dissolved, wound up and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution, winding up and termination of members and holders of financial rights, whose preferential rights are superior to those receiving the distribution; provided, however, that the value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the total assets of the LLC, only to the extent that the value of the property exceeds such liability.

Basis for determination. An LLC may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances, or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

Timing of determination. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), the effect of a distribution under subsection (a) is measured:

In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption or other acquisition of a membership interest or financial rights in an LLC, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the LLC; and

In all other cases, as of the date the:

Distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within four (4) months after the date of authorization; or

Payment is made, if it occurs more than four (4) months after the date of authorization.

Parity of indebtedness. Indebtedness of an LLC to a member or holder of financial rights, or indebtedness incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section, is at parity with the LLC's indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors, except to the extent such indebtedness is subordinated by agreement, or, in the event of dissolution and liquidation, to the extent otherwise provided in § 48-249-620.

Status as liability. Indebtedness of an LLC, including indebtedness issued in connection with, or as part of, a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of determinations under subsection (a), if its terms provide that payment of principal and interest are made only if, and to the extent that, payment of a distribution to members and holders of financial rights could then be made under this section.

Treatment of payments. If the indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-307. Liability for unlawful distributions.

Personal liability for approving. A member, manager or director of an LLC who votes for or consents to a distribution made in violation of § 48-249-306 or the LLC documents is personally liable to the LLC for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without violating § 48-249-306 or the LLC documents, if such member, manager or director did not comply with the applicable standards of conduct for such member, manager or director, as set forth in § 48-249-403.

Personal liability for receiving. A member or holder of financial rights who receives a distribution, and who knows the distribution was made in violation of § 48-249-306 or the LLC documents, is personally liable to the LLC, but only to the extent that the distribution received by the member or holder of financial rights exceeded the amount that could have been properly distributed under § 48-249-306 or the LLC documents.

Permitted impleader. A member, holder of financial rights, manager or director against whom an action is brought under this section may implead in the action all:

Other members, holders of financial rights, managers and directors who voted for or consented to the distribution in violation of subsection (a), and may compel contribution from them; and

Members and holders of financial rights who received a distribution in violation of subsection (b), and may compel contribution from the members or holders of financial rights in the amount received in violation of subsection (b).

Time limitation. A member or holder of financial rights who receives a distribution from an LLC or a member, manager or director who votes for or consents to the distribution shall have no liability under this section or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three (3) years from the date of the distribution.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, §§ 25, 26.

48-249-308. Right to information.

General. An LLC shall provide members, and their agents and attorneys, access to its records at the LLC's principal executive office or other reasonable location specified in the LLC documents. An LLC shall provide former members, and their agents and attorneys, access to records for proper purposes pertaining to the periods during which they were members. The right of access provides the opportunity to inspect or copy records during ordinary business hours, if the member, or its agent or attorney, gives the LLC written notice of such demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the member, or its agent or attorney, wishes to inspect or copy. An LLC may impose a reasonable charge, limited to the costs of labor and material, for copies of records furnished under this subsection (a), except that copies of the LLC documents and records required to be maintained under § 48-249-406 shall be copied upon demand and at the LLC's expense.

Members. An LLC shall furnish to a member and to the personal representative of a deceased member or member under legal disability:

Without demand, information reasonably required to comply with the requirements of either federal or state tax laws concerning the member's financial rights, if any, and information concerning the LLC's business or affairs reasonably required for the proper exercise of the member's rights and performance of the member's duties under the LLC documents or this chapter; and

On written demand, other information concerning the LLC's business or affairs, except to the extent the demand or the information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

Holders of financial rights. Holders of financial rights, and their agents and attorneys, shall have a limited right of access, in order to obtain information reasonably required to comply with the requirements of either federal or state tax laws concerning their financial rights. The right of access provides the opportunity to inspect or copy records for such purpose during ordinary business hours, if the holder of financial rights, or its agent or attorney, gives the LLC written notice of a demand to inspect or copy the records at least five (5) business days before the date on which the holder of financial rights, or its agent or attorney, wishes to inspect or copy. An LLC may impose a reasonable charge, limited to the costs of labor and material, for copies of records furnished.

Remedies. If an LLC does not allow a member that complies with subsection(a), or a holder of financial rights that complies with subsection (c), as applicable, to inspect or copy any records required by the applicable subsection to be available for inspection, a court in the county in which the principal executive office of the LLC, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located may summarily order inspection or copying of the records demanded, at the expense of the LLC, on application of such member or holder of financial rights, as applicable. If the court orders inspection or copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the LLC to pay the costs, including reasonable attorneys fees, of the member or holder of financial rights, as applicable, incurred to obtain the order, if the member or holder of financial rights proves that the LLC refused inspection without a reasonable basis for doubt regarding the right of the member or holder of financial rights to inspect the records demanded. If the court orders inspection or copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member or holder of financial rights, as applicable.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-309. Series of members, holders, managers, directors, membership interests or financial rights.

Establishment of series. The LLC documents may establish, or provide for the establishment of, one (1) or more designated series of members, holders, managers, directors, membership interests or financial rights having separate rights, powers or duties, with respect to specified property or obligations of the LLC, or profits and losses associated with specified property or obligations, and any such series may have a separate business purpose or investment objective.

Separateness of series.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this chapter, or under other applicable law, the debts, liabilities, obligations and expenses incurred, contracted for or otherwise existing, with respect to a particular series established under subsection (a), shall be enforceable against the assets of such series only, and not against the assets of the LLC generally, or any other series of the LLC, and, unless otherwise provided in the LLC documents, none of the debts, liabilities, obligations and expenses incurred, contracted for or otherwise existing with respect to the LLC generally, or any other series of the LLC, shall be enforceable against the assets of such series, in the event that:

The LLC documents establish or provide for the establishment of one (1) or more series;

Separate and distinct records are maintained for any such series, and the assets associated with any such series are reflected and held in such separate and distinct records, directly or indirectly, including through a nominee or otherwise, and accounted for in such separate and distinct records separately from the other assets of the LLC and the assets of any other series of the LLC; and

Notice of the limitation on liabilities of a series, as referenced in this subsection (b) is set forth in the articles of the LLC.

Notice in the articles of the limitation on liabilities of a series as provided in this subsection (b) shall be sufficient for all purposes of this chapter, whether or not the LLC has established any series, when such notice is included in the articles, and there shall be no requirement that any specific series of the LLC be referenced in such notice. The fact that articles that contain the notice of the limitation on liabilities of a series is on file with the secretary of state shall constitute notice of such limitation on liabilities of a series.

Voluntary personal liability. Notwithstanding § 48-249-114(a), a member may agree to be liable for all of the debts, liabilities and obligations of one (1) or more specified series of an LLC, by provision in the articles with respect to such specified series in the manner set forth in § 48-249-114(f). Such provision in the articles with respect to one (1) or more specified series of an LLC shall not cause the member to be liable for the debts, liabilities and obligations of any of the other series of the LLC.

Classification of interests and voting rights. The LLC documents may include the provisions authorized under § 48-249-303(a) or (b), or both, as to the directors, members, managers or holders of financial rights associated with a particular series, as if the series were a separate LLC.

Distributions. Sections 48-249-304 — 48-249-306 shall apply to a series of an LLC, as if the series were a separate LLC.

Management duties; admission of members; transfer. Parts 4 and 5 of this chapter shall apply to a series of an LLC, as if the series were a separate LLC.

Termination. A series of an LLC may be terminated and its affairs wound up without causing the dissolution of the LLC or the termination of any other series of the LLC and without affecting the limitation on liability of the terminated series or any other series of the LLC. All provisions of this chapter regarding dissolution or winding up of an LLC, including the rights of members, directors or managers to cause a dissolution of an LLC, shall apply to a series of an LLC, as if the series were a separate LLC.

Events of termination. A series of an LLC shall be terminated and its affairs shall be wound up upon the occurrence of the same events or reasons as are provided in this chapter for an LLC.

Series of foreign LLCs. If a foreign LLC that is applying for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, or is authorized to transact business in this state, is governed by articles, an operating agreement or similar equivalent documents that establish or provide for the establishment of designated series of members, directors, managers or interests having separate rights, powers or duties with respect to specified property or obligations of the foreign LLC or profits and losses associated with specified property or obligations, that fact shall be so stated in the foreign LLC's application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, or an amendment of such certificate of authority. In addition, the foreign LLC shall state in such application or amendment, as applicable, whether the debts, liabilities, obligations and expenses incurred, contracted for or otherwise existing with respect to a particular series, if any, shall be enforceable against the assets of such series only, and not against the assets of the foreign LLC generally or any other series of the foreign LLC, and, unless otherwise provided in such application or amendment, none of the debts, liabilities, obligations and expenses incurred, contracted for or otherwise existing with respect to the foreign LLC generally, or any other series of the foreign LLC, shall be enforceable against the assets of such series.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a series of an LLC may, in its own name:

Contract;

Hold title to assets, including real, personal, and intangible property;

Grant liens and security interests; and

Sue and be sued.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, § 27; 2018, ch. 759, § 1.